apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="begr/aben__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>abend</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abe</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abe</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abe</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abest</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abet</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äbst</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abt</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abt</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äbt</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üben</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>übe</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>übe</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>übest</l>     <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>übet</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ub</l>        <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ub</l>        <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubst</l>      <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubt</l>       <r>aben<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="begr/eifen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eifend</l>    <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eife</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eife</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eife</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifest</l>    <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifet</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eif</l>       <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eifst</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eift</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eift</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eift</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffen</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffe</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffe</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffest</l>    <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffet</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iff</l>       <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iff</l>       <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iffst</l>     <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ifft</l>      <r>eifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="begraben">        <i>begr</i><par n="begr/aben__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begreifen">       <i>begr</i><par n="begr/eifen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ergreifen">       <i>ergr</i><par n="begr/eifen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="untergraben">     <i>untergr</i><par n="begr/aben__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vergraben">       <i>vergr</i><par n="begr/aben__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vergreifen">      <i>vergr</i><par n="begr/eifen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verkneifen">      <i>verkn</i><par n="begr/eifen__vblex"/></e>
